District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.103

Repealed

Acceptance of subchapter — Procedure for filing of statement of election.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 304, Pub. L. 87-569, § 103
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1099d.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.5.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.103.